Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6118.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "health facility consolidation prevention act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Affiliate" means a person that directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another person. (b) "Applicant" means a person that applies for approval of a health facility consolidation in accordance with section 7. (c) "Board" means the hospital cost review board created in the hospital cost review board act. (d) "Consolidated bed count" means the combined number of beds of each hospital that is subject to a health facility consolidation. (e) "Consolidated market share" means the combined market share of each health facility that is subject to a health facility consolidation in a category of health services. (f) "Consumer Price Index" means the most comprehensive index of consumer prices available for the Detroit-Warren-Dearborn area from the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor. (g) "Control" means the direct or indirect power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by contract, or otherwise. (h) "Department" means the department of licensing and regulatory affairs. (i) "Fund" means the health care cost reduction fund created in the health care cost reduction fund act. (j) "Health facility" means any of the following: (i) A health facility or agency licensed under article 17 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20101 to 333.22260, including, but not limited to, a hospital. (ii) Any other facility or agency where a health professional provides a health service to patients as a primary function of the facility or agency. (k) "Health facility acquisition" means any of the following: (i) An acquisition by a health facility owner of another health facility. (ii) An acquisition by a person of 2 or more health facilities that are not currently owned by the same health facility owner. (iii) An acquisition by a health facility owner of a controlling interest in another health facility owner. (iv) An acquisition by a person of a controlling interest in 2 or more health facility owners that are not currently controlled by the same health facility owner. (l) "Health facility consolidation" or "consolidation" means a transaction or a series of transactions that results in a health facility acquisition or a health facility merger. (m) "Health facility merger" means a merger between 2 or more health facility owners. (n) "Health facility owner" or "owner" means a person that owns, operates, or governs a health facility and the person's subsidiaries and affiliates. (o) "Health professional" means an individual who is licensed, registered, or otherwise authorized to provide a health service in the ordinary course of business or practice of a health profession. Health professional does not include a veterinarian. (p) "Health service" means any of the following: (i) Any care, service, or procedure provided by a health professional to diagnose, treat, or maintain a patient's physical condition, or that affects the structure or function of the human body. (ii) Except as used in subdivision (e), any ancillary product or service that is provided with a care, service, or procedure described in subparagraph (i). (q) "Hospital" means that term as defined in section 20106 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.20106. (r) "Person" means an individual or a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. (s) "Prosperity region" means that term as defined in section 9130 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.9130. (t) "Target health facility" means either of the following: (i) A health facility to be acquired in connection with a proposed health facility acquisition. (ii) A health facility that is subject to a proposed health facility merger of which the applicant for the proposed health facility merger is not the owner of the health facility. Sec. 5. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), a person shall not enter into a health facility consolidation unless both of the following conditions are met: (a) The board has approved the consolidation under section 7. (b) The applicant has paid the health facility consolidation prevention assessment in accordance with section 9. (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, a health facility consolidation is not subject to this act if all of the following conditions are met: (a) One or more of the following is met: (i) A party to the consolidation is a health professional. (ii) A health facility that is subject to the consolidation is owned by 1 or more health professionals. (b) For each health facility owner that is a party to the consolidation, the combined annual revenue of all health facilities owned, operated, or governed by the owner is not more than $5,000,000.00. (c) The combined annual revenue of all health facilities that are subject to the consolidation is not more than $10,000,000.00. Sec. 7. (1) An applicant may file an application with the board for approval of a health facility consolidation in the form and manner prescribed by the board. If the consolidation is a health facility acquisition, the applicant must be the acquiring entity. If the consolidation is a health facility merger, the applicant must be the owner of the most assets that are subject to the health facility merger. The application must include or attach all of the following: (a) All documents related to the governance and ownership of the parties to the proposed consolidation, including, but not limited to, articles of incorporation or organization, bylaws, operating agreements, and organizational charts, as applicable. (b) All agreements and proposed agreements that comprise the proposed consolidation, and all attachments to those agreements. (c) All of the following information for each owner that is a party to the proposed consolidation: (i) The number of hospital beds currently operated by the owner in this state and in each prosperity region. (ii) A summary of any other health facilities that the owner currently owns, operates, or governs in this state and in each prosperity region, divided by type of facility. (d) All available information on the effect that the proposed consolidation would have on the availability or accessibility of health services. (e) Evidence that demonstrates the applicant's commitments regarding pricing of health services described in subsection (5)(b) and (c), as applicable. (f) An application for a hardship exemption under subsection (3), as applicable. (g) Any additional information and documents that the board considers necessary to review and evaluate the proposed consolidation. (2) An application filed under subsection (1) must be accompanied by an application fee of $10,000.00. Money received from application fees under this subsection must be deposited in the fund. (3) An application filed under subsection (1) may include an application for a hardship exemption from the conditions set forth in subsection (5)(a) and (b) in the form and manner prescribed by the board. The board shall grant the hardship exemption if all of the following conditions are met: (a) A health facility to be acquired by or merged with in connection with the proposed consolidation is financially struggling and is at risk of closing. (b) The proposed consolidation is the only feasible way to prevent the closure of the health facility described in subdivision (a). (c) The owner of the health facility described in subdivision (a) supports the grant of the hardship exemption. (4) The board shall notify the department if the board grants a hardship exemption under subsection (3). (5) The board shall review an application filed under subsection (1) for a proposed health facility consolidation. Subject to subsection (3), the board shall not approve a proposed consolidation unless all of the following conditions are met: (a) The proposed consolidation would not result in any of the following: (i) A consolidated bed count in excess of 8% of all beds in this state. (ii) A consolidated bed count in excess of 15% of all beds in a prosperity region. (iii) A consolidated market share in excess of 3% of the total market share in this state for any category of health services. (iv) A consolidated market share in excess of 15% of the total market share in a prosperity region for any category of health services. (b) The applicant, for itself or on behalf of the proposed owner of a target health facility if the applicant is not the proposed owner, demonstrates a commitment to decrease prices of health services at each target health facility by not less than 2% upon entering into the consolidation. (c) The applicant, for itself or on behalf of the proposed owner of a target health facility if the applicant is not the proposed owner, demonstrates a commitment to not increase prices of health services at each target health facility by more than the annual percentage change in the Consumer Price Index in a given calendar year. (6) If an application meets the conditions set forth in subsection (5), or the application meets the condition set forth in subsection (5)(c) and the board has granted a hardship exemption under subsection (3), the board shall approve the application and provide written notice to the applicant. If the board does not approve the application, the board shall provide written notice to the applicant stating the reasons that the application is not approved. Sec. 9. (1) An applicant must pay a health facility consolidation prevention assessment in accordance with this section before entering into the health facility consolidation. The health facility consolidation prevention assessment is a tax that is levied on the applicant. (2) The health facility consolidation prevention assessment must be in an amount as follows: (a) For a proposed health facility consolidation that is conducted as a purchase, an amount equal to 12% of the total purchase price of the proposed health facility consolidation. (b) For a proposed health facility consolidation that is not conducted as a purchase, an amount equal to 12% of the combined value of the health facilities that are subject to the proposed health facility consolidation and are not owned by the party to the proposed health facility consolidation that owns the most health facility assets. (3) To determine the amount of the health facility consolidation prevention assessment required under subsection (2), an applicant may submit the estimated value of a proposed health facility consolidation to the board for review. A submission under this subsection must be accompanied by a description of the methodology that the applicant used to calculate the estimated value. If the board receives a submission under this subsection, the board shall consult with the applicant to evaluate the accuracy of the submission. The board may adjust the estimated value as the board determines is necessary to provide an objective measure of the value of the proposed health facility consolidation. (4) An applicant must pay the health facility consolidation prevention assessment to the department of treasury in the form and manner prescribed by the department of treasury. (5) The department of treasury shall administer the health facility consolidation prevention assessment under 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.1 to 205.31, and this act. If 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.1 to 205.31, and this act conflict, this act applies. (6) The department of treasury shall prescribe the forms necessary for the administration of the health facility consolidation prevention assessment and may promulgate rules to implement this section under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (7) The state treasurer shall deposit money received from health facility consolidation prevention assessments under this section in the fund. Sec. 11. (1) The board may do any of the following in connection with the board's review of a proposed health facility consolidation: (a) Send a written request to a party to the proposed consolidation, or an affiliate, officer, director, partner, agent, or employee of the party, requiring the person to provide additional information or documents related to the proposed consolidation. A person shall provide the additional information or documents to the board not later than 30 days after receiving the written request. If a person is not able to fully comply with the written request, the person shall provide to the board a statement of the reasons that the person is not able to fully comply with the written request. (b) Consult or contract with an expert, consultant, or governmental entity to assist in reviewing and evaluating the proposed consolidation. (c) Hold 1 or more public hearings on the proposed consolidation. A public hearing held under this subdivision must be conducted in accordance with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. (2) The board may require an applicant to reimburse the board for its costs related to a review of a proposed consolidation. An applicant that receives a request under this subsection shall reimburse the board not later than 30 days after receiving the request. (3) Unless otherwise provided by law, confidential business information possessed or retained by the board in performing an official function under this act is exempt from disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. As used in this subsection, "confidential business information" means information that has not been publicly disseminated or that is unavailable from other sources, the release of which might cause a health facility harm. (4) Unless otherwise prohibited or restricted by law, the department of health and human services, the department of insurance and financial services, and any other state department shall cooperate with the board and provide the board with information on the board's request. Sec. 13. (1) Upon entering into a health facility consolidation, the owner of a target health facility that was subject to the consolidation shall decrease prices of health services at the target health facility in accordance with the commitment described in section 7(5)(b). (2) After entering into a health facility consolidation, the owner of a target health facility that was subject to the consolidation shall not increase prices of health services at the target health facility in excess of the commitment described in section 7(5)(c). Sec. 15. A person shall not hire a health professional with the intent to circumvent the requirements of this act that would apply if the person were to acquire or merge with the health facility that employs the health professional. Sec. 17. (1) A person that violates section 5 is subject to a civil fine of not more than 15% of the transaction value of the health facility consolidation. (2) A person that violates section 13 or 15 is subject to a civil fine of not more than $10,000.00 for each day of violation. (3) A civil fine collected under this section must be deposited into the fund. Sec. 19. The attorney general may bring an action on behalf of the board to enforce this act. In an action brought under this section, the court may do any of the following: (a) Order a person to comply with this act or a rule promulgated under this act. (b) Order the payment of a civil fine under section 17. (c) Enjoin the parties to a proposed health facility consolidation from entering into the consolidation. (d) Declare that a health facility consolidation entered into in violation of this act is void. (e) Grant other relief as the court determines necessary or appropriate. Sec. 21. (1) By not later than March 1 of each year, the board shall submit a report to the department and the house of representatives and senate standing committees on health policy that includes all of the following information, by hospital system: (a) The amount of expenditures on health facility consolidations. (b) The number of applications, including applications for a hardship exemption, submitted under this act, and the status of those applications. (c) The number of violations of this act. (2) The department shall post a copy of the report required under this section on the department's website in an area that is accessible to the public. Sec. 23. The board may promulgate rules to implement this act under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 6116 (request no. H06007'26). (b) House Bill No. 6117 (request no. H06751'26).